Maryland, session 2025, SB0461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–701.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(7) “Overburdened community” means any census tract for which three or
more of the following environmental health indicators are above the 75th percentile
statewide:
(i) Particulate matter (PM) 2.5;
(ii) Ozone;
(iii) National Air Toxics Assessment (NATA) diesel PM;
(iv) NATA cancer risk;
(v) NATA respiratory hazard index;
(vi) Traffic proximity;

SENATE BILL 461 3
(vii) Lead paint indicator;
(viii) National Priorities List Superfund site proximity;
(ix) Risk Management Plan facility proximity;
(x) Hazardous waste proximity;
(xi) Wastewater discharge indicator;
(xii) Proximity to a Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation (CAFO);
(xiii) Percent of the population lacking broadband coverage;
(xiv) Asthma emergency room discharges;
(xv) Myocardial infarction discharges;
(xvi) Low–birth–weight infants;
(xvii) Proximity to emitting power plants;
(xviii) Proximity to a Toxic Release Inventory (TRI) facility;
(xix) Proximity to a brownfields site;
(xx) Proximity to mining operations; and
(xxi) Proximity to a hazardous waste landfill.
(8) “Underserved community” means any census tract in which, according
to the most recent U.S. Census Bureau Survey:
(i) At least 25% of the residents qualify as low–income;
(ii) At least 50% of the residents identify as nonwhite; or
(iii) At least 15% of the residents have limited English proficiency.
5–5B–02.
This subtitle applies to public water systems serving at least 10,000 individuals that:
(1) Apply for a new or expanded water appropriation permit; or

SENATE BILL 461
(2) Apply for State financial assistance including the Maryland Water
Quality IMPROVEMENT Revolving Loan Fund as provided in § 9–1605 of this article and
any other State funding source.
5–5B–05.
(b) In reviewing and prioritizing requests by public water systems, as defined by
this subtitle, for State financial assistance through the Maryland Water Quality
IMPROVEMENT Revolving Loan Fund under § 9–1605 of this article and other State
funding sources, the Department shall consider local initiatives and voluntary efforts, and
the best management practices set forth for implementation within a financial assistance
application.
(c) On or before October 1, 2003, the Department shall issue guidelines to public
water systems on best management practices for improving water conservation and
efficiency in water use, treatment, storage, and transmission, including:
(1) Costs and cost–savings associated with implementing examples of
specific best management practices;
(2) Water conservation associated with implementing specific best
management practices; and
(3) Priority eligibility for funding through State financial resources for
drinking water and wastewater treatment improvements including the Maryland Water
Quality IMPROVEMENT Revolving Loan Fund under § 9–1605 of this article and other
State or federal financial assistance when best management practices are implemented.
9–1601.
(a) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, in this subtitle the following
words have the meanings indicated.
(mm) “Water Quality Fund” means the Maryland Water Quality IMPROVEMENT
Revolving Loan Fund.
9–1605.
(a) (1) (i) There is a Maryland Water Quality IMPROVEMENT Revolving
Loan Fund.
(ii) The Water Quality Fund shall be maintained and administered
by the Administration in accordance with the provisions of this subtitle and such rules or
program directives as the Secretary or the Board may from time to time prescribe.
(2) The Water Quality Fund is a special, continuing, nonlapsing fund which
is not subject to § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article and which shall be

SENATE BILL 461 5
available in perpetuity for the purpose of providing financial assistance TO PRESERVE,
MAINTAIN, AND IMPROVE THE WATER RESOURCES OF THE STATE in accordance with
the provisions of this subtitle and Title VI of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act.
(d) Amounts in the Water Quality Fund may be used only:
(15) To provide loan guarantees for similar revolving funds established by
municipalities or intermunicipal agencies; [and]
(16) To serve as guarantee for long–term Pay for Success contracts, green
bonds, or environmental impact bonds by any public, private, or nonprofit entity for the
purchase of outcomes that provide a water quality benefit; AND
(17) TO SUPPORT PROJECTS THAT INVOLVE:
(I) DECENTRALIZED WASTEWATER SYSTEMS;
(II) STORMWATER MANAGEMENT INFRASTRUCTURE;
(III) FLOODWATERS;
(IV) FLOODPLAINS;
(V) STREAMS;
(VI) TRIBUTARIES;
(VII) WETLANDS; AND
(VIII) TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR PROJECTS UNDER THIS ITEM.
(f) In creating an intended use plan for the Water Quality Fund, the
Administration shall [prioritize]:
(1) INCLUDE IN THE PLAN:
[(1)] (I) Opportunities to provide TECHNICAL assistance to
[disadvantaged] OVERBURDENED communities [or communities], AS DEFINED IN §
1–701 OF THIS ARTICLE, THAT HAVE BEEN disproportionately [burdened] IMPACTED
by environmental harms and risks; and
[(2)] (II) Green and blue infrastructure[, with particular focus on natural
areas or natural features]; AND

SENATE BILL 461
(2) USE A SCORING SYSTEM THAT:
(I) EVALUATES APPLICATIONS FOR THE FUND TO ENSURE
THAT FUNDING PRIORITY IS GIVEN TO UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES, AS DEFINED
IN § 1–701 OF THIS ARTICLE, THAT ARE DISADVANTAGED BY:
1. ECONOMIC DISTRESS;
2. HIGH ENVIRONMENTAL BURDENS; AND
3. INSUFFICIENT INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(II) REVIEWS AND CONSIDERS APPLICATIONS THAT WERE
PREVIOUSLY DENIED AND THAT INCLUDED PROJECTS THAT:
1. ALIGNED WITH THE STATE’S LAWS AND GOALS
INVOLVING:
A. CLIMATE CHANGE;
B. FLOOD MITIGATION; AND
C. WATER QUALITY;
2. PROVIDED TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR IMPROVING
INSUFFICIENT OR FAILED INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
3. INVOLVED:
A. OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES; AND
B. AREAS WITH SIGNIFICANT ENVIRONMENTAL HARM.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
5–7B–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Growth–related project” means only the items set forth below:
(iv) funding by the Department of the Environment, for any project
under:

SENATE BILL 461 7
1. §§ 9–1601 through 9–1605 (Water Quality
IMPROVEMENT Revolving Loan Fund) of the Environment Article except for funding
nonpoint source pollution projects;
2. §§ 9–420 through 9–426 (Water Supply Financial
Assistance Program) of the Environment Article; and
3. the supplemental assistance program authorized under
Title 9, Subtitle 3, Part VI of the Environment Article; and
6–226.
(a) (2) (ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
47. Maryland Water Quality IMPROVEMENT Revolving Loan
Fund;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.